Utah statutes.
78A-10-205.   Expenses -- Per diem and travel.
A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service,
but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(1)  Section 63A-3-106;
(2)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(3)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
